Utah statutes.
10-2-128.   Form of government -- Election of officers of new town.

(1)  A newly incorporated town shall operate under the five-member council form of government as defined in Section 10-3b-102.

(2) (a)  The county legislative body of the county in which a newly incorporated town is located shall hold an election for town officers at the next special election after the regular general election in which the town incorporation is approved.

(b)  The officers elected at an election described in Subsection (2)(a) shall take office at noon on the first Monday in January next following the special election described in Subsection (2)(a).

